Georgia, session 2025_26, HB742.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF GEORGIA:
SECTION 1.
An Act to provide a new charter for the City of Broxton, Georgia, in the County of Coffee,
approved April 6, 1981 (Ga. L. 1981, p. 3597), as amended, is amended by revising
Section 2.3 as follows:
"Section 2.3
The mayor shall receive as compensation for his or her services $625.00 per month. Each
councilmember shall receive as compensation for his or her services $425.00 per month. The
mayor and councilmembers shall also be entitled to be reimbursed for their actual and
necessary expenses incurred in the performance of their duties."
H. B. 742
- 1 -

LC 61 0197/AP
SECTION 2.
All laws and parts of laws in conflict with this Act are repealed.
H. B. 742
- 2 -